Oklahoma, session 2025, SB793.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be


codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:


The Legislature finds and declares the following:





Req. No. 2 Page 1


1. In 2005, the United States Supreme Court recognized that it


is permissible to display the Ten Commandments on government


property in Van Orden v. Perry, 545 U.S. 677, 688 (2005);


2. Section 2101 of Title 25 of the Oklahoma Statutes authorizes


the display of the Ten Commandments in the public buildings or


grounds of every county, municipality, city, town, school, or any


other political subdivision;


3. In 2019, the United States Supreme Court further recognized


that the Ten Commandments “have historical significance as one of


the foundations of our legal system…” in American Legion v. American


Humanists Association, 588 U.S. 29, 53 (2019), and the Court also


ruled that the displaying of the Ten Commandments on public property


may have “multiple purposes” such as “historical significance” and


represent a “common cultural heritage.” id,588 U.S. at 54;


4. Recognizing the historical role of the Ten Commandments


accords with the history of the United States and faithfully


reflects the understanding of the nation’s founders with respect to


the necessity of civic morality to a functional self-government.


History records that James Madison, the fourth president of the


United States, stated that “(w)e have staked the whole future of our


new nation...upon the capacity of each of ourselves to govern


according to the moral principles of the Ten Commandments”;





Req. No. 2 Page 2


5. Including the Ten Commandments in the education of the


children of this state is part of the history, culture, and


tradition of this state and the United States;


6. The text of the Ten Commandments set forth in paragraph 2 of


subsection A of Section 2 of this act is identical to the text of


the Ten Commandments monument that was upheld by the United States


Supreme Court in Van Orden v. Perry, 545 U.S. 677,688 (2005);


7. The Mayflower Compact of 1620 was America’s first written


constitution and made a covenant with God to “form a civil body


politic.” This was the first purely American document of self-


government and affirmed the link between civil society and God;


8. The Northwest Ordinance of 1787 provided a method of


admitting new states to the Union from the territory as the country


expanded to the Pacific Ocean. The Ordinance “extended the


fundamental principles of civil and religious liberty” to the


territories and stated that “(r)eligion, morality, and knowledge,


being necessary to good government and the happiness of mankind,


schools, and the means of education shall forever be encouraged”;


9. It is the intent of the Legislature to apply the decision


set forth by the United States Supreme Court in Van Orden v. Perry,


id, to continue the rich tradition and ensure that students in


public schools in this state may understand and appreciate the


foundational documents of the government of this state and the


United States;

Req. No. 2 Page 3


10. The United States Supreme Court acknowledged that the Ten


Commandments may be displayed on local government property when a


private donation is made for the purchase of the historical


monument, Pleasant Grove City, Utah v. Summum, 555 U.S. 460 (2009);


and


11. It is the intent of the Legislature that the provisions of


this section shall not create an unfunded mandate on any school


district board of education or charter school governing board. The


boards of education and governing boards are encouraged to use


documents that are printed and made available to schools free of


charge.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 24-106.2 of Title 70, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. 1. No later than January 1, 2026, each school district


board of education and charter school governing board shall display


the Ten Commandments in each classroom in each school under its


jurisdiction. The nature of the display shall be determined by each


board of education or governing board with a minimum requirement


that the Ten Commandments shall be displayed on a poster or framed


document that is at least eleven (11) inches by fourteen (14)


inches. The text of the Ten Commandments shall be the central focus


of the poster or framed document and shall be printed in a large,


easily readable font.

Req. No. 2 Page 4


2. The text shall read as follows:


“The Ten Commandments


I AM the Lord thy God.


Thou shalt have no other gods before me.


Thou shalt not make to thyself any graven images.


Thou shalt not take the Name of the Lord thy God in vain.


Remember the Sabbath day, to keep it holy.


Honor thy father and thy mother, that thy days may be long upon the


land which the Lord thy God giveth thee.


Thou shalt not kill.


Thou shalt not commit adultery.


Thou shalt not steal.


Thou shalt not bear false witness against thy neighbor.


Thou shalt not covet thy neighbor’s house.


Thou shalt not covet thy neighbor’s wife, nor his manservant, nor


his maidservant, nor his cattle, nor anything that is thy


neighbor’s.”


3. The Ten Commandments shall be displayed with a context


statement as follows:


“The History of the Ten Commandments in American Public Education:


The Ten Commandments were a prominent part of American public


education for almost three centuries. Around the year 1688, The New


England Primer became the first published American textbook and was


the equivalent of a first grade reader. The New England Primer was

Req. No. 2 Page 5


used in public schools throughout the United States for more than


one hundred fifty years to teach Americans to read and contained


more than forty questions about the Ten Commandments.


The Ten Commandments were also included in public school textbooks


published by educator William McGuffey, a noted university president


and professor. A version of his famous McGuffey Readers was written


in the early 1800s and became one of the most popular textbooks in


the history of American education, selling more than one hundred


million copies. Copies of the McGuffey Readers are still available


today.


The Ten Commandments also appeared in textbooks published by Noah


Webster and which were widely used in American public schools along


with America’s first comprehensive dictionary that Webster also


published. His textbook, The American Spelling Book, contained the


Ten Commandments and sold more than one hundred million copies for


use by public school children all across the nation and was still


available for use in American public schools in the year 1975.”


4. A public school district or charter school in this state may


also display the Mayflower Compact, the Declaration of Independence,


as provided for in Section 24-106.1 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma


Statutes, and the Northwest Ordinance with the Ten Commandments.


5. The provisions of this section shall not require a school


district board of education or charter school governing body to



Req. No. 2 Page 6


spend its funds to purchase displays. To provide the displays free


of charge, the board of education or governing body shall:


a. accept donated funds to purchase the displays, or


b. accept donated displays.


6. The State Department of Education shall identify and publish


on its website appropriate resources to comply with the provisions


of this section that are free of charge.


B. The State Board of Education shall promulgate rules to


oversee implementation of the provisions of this act.


SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 3205.15 of Title 70, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. 1. No later than January 1, 2026, the governing board of


each institution within The Oklahoma State System of Higher


Education shall require each institution under its jurisdiction to


display the Ten Commandments in each classroom on the institution’s


campus. At a minimum, the Ten Commandments shall be displayed on a


poster or framed document that is at least eleven (11) inches by


fourteen (14) inches. The text of the Ten Commandments shall be the


central focus of the poster or framed document and shall be printed


in a large, easily readable font.


2. The text of the Ten Commandments shall be identical to the


language set forth in paragraph 2 of subsection A of Section 2 of


this act.

Req. No. 2 Page 7


3. The provisions of this section shall not require the


governing board of an institution of higher education within The


Oklahoma State System of Higher Education to spend its funds to


purchase such displays. The governing board of an institution may


spend donated funds to purchase the Ten Commandments or may accept


donated displays.


B. The Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education shall


promulgate rules to oversee implementation of the provisions of this


act.


SECTION 4. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.


SECTION 5. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-2 EB 1/19/2025 5:43:26 AM

















Req. No. 2 Page 8